Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.092

Advanced college tuition payment program—Reopening—Reinvigorating the program.

The governing body shall begin and continue to accept applications for new tuition unit contracts and authorize the sale of new tuition units by July 1, 2018. Upon reopening the advanced college tuition payment program, in any year in which the total annual sale of tuition units is below five hundred thousand, the governing body shall determine how to reinvigorate the advanced college tuition payment program to incentivize Washingtonians to enter into tuition unit contracts and purchase tuition units.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 957; 2016 c 69 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.